Utah statutes.
32A-4-102 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Application and renewal requirements.

(1)  A person seeking a restaurant liquor license under this part shall file a written application with the department, in a form prescribed by the department.  It shall be accompanied by:

(a)  a nonrefundable $250 application fee;

(b)  an initial license fee of $1,750, which is refundable if a license is not granted;

(c)  written consent of the local authority;

(d)  a copy of the applicant's current business license;

(e)  evidence of proximity to any community location, with proximity requirements being governed by Section 32A-4-101;

(f)  a bond as specified by Section 32A-4-105;

(g)  a floor plan of the restaurant, including consumption areas and the area where the applicant proposes to keep, store, and sell liquor;

(h)  evidence that the restaurant is carrying public liability insurance in an amount and form satisfactory to the department;

(i)  evidence that the restaurant is carrying dramshop insurance coverage of at least $1,000,000 per occurrence and $2,000,000 in the aggregate;

(j)  a signed consent form stating that the restaurant will permit any authorized representative of the commission, department, or any law enforcement officer unrestricted right to enter the restaurant;

(k)  in the case of an applicant that is a partnership, corporation, or limited liability company, proper verification evidencing that the person or persons signing the restaurant application are authorized to so act on behalf of the partnership, corporation, or limited liability company; and

(l)  any other information the commission or department may require.

(2) (a) A restaurant liquor license expires on October 31 of each year.

(b) A person desiring to renew the person's restaurant liquor license shall by no later than September 30 submit:

(i)  a completed renewal application to the department; and

(ii)  a renewal fee in the following amount:

Gross Cost of Liquor in Previous License Year for the Licensee		Renewal Fee

under $5,000									$750

equals or exceeds $5,000 but less than $10,000				$900

equals or exceeds $10,000 but less than $25,000				$1,250

equals or exceeds $25,000							$1,500

(c)  Failure to meet the renewal requirements shall result in an automatic forfeiture of the license effective on the date the existing license expires.

(d)  A renewal application shall be in a form as prescribed by the department.

(3)  To ensure compliance with Subsection 32A-4-106(25), the commission may suspend or revoke a restaurant liquor license if the restaurant liquor licensee does not immediately notify the department of any change in:

(a)  ownership of the restaurant;

(b)  for a corporate owner, the:

(i)  corporate officers or directors; or

(ii)  shareholders holding at least 20% of the total issued and outstanding stock of the corporation; or

(c)  for a limited liability company:

(i)  managers; or

(ii)  members owning at least 20% of the limited liability company.

